Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Circuit Clerks

§ 9-7-121.
Clerk; oath of office and bond.

The clerk of the circuit court, before he enters upon the duties of the office, shall take the oath of office, and give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to three percent (3%) of the sum of all the state and county taxes shown by the assessment rolls and the levies to have been collectible in the county for the year immediately preceding the commencement of the term of office for such clerk. However, such bond shall not exceed the amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). And he may be required to give additional bond from time to time, for the faithful application of all moneys coming into his hands by law or order of the court; but such additional bonds shall be cumulative security, and the original bond shall likewise cover all moneys coming into the hands of the clerk by law or order of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, art. 2 (9); 1857, ch. 61, art. 16; 1871, § 550; 1880, § 1484; 1892, § 633; 1906, § 690; Hemingway’s 1917, § 469; 1930, § 478; 1942, § 1416; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 386, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 9-7-122.
Training and continuing education requirements for circuit clerks; filing of certificate of compliance; penalty for failure to file; courses; expenses; continuing education credit for attendance at circuit court proceedings; compliance with Section 9-1-46.

Except as otherwise provided herein, no circuit clerk elected for a full term of office commencing on or after January 1, 1996, shall exercise any functions of office or be eligible to take the oath of office unless and until the circuit clerk has filed in the office of the chancery clerk a certificate of completion of a course of training and education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center within six (6) months of the beginning of the term for which such circuit clerk is elected. A circuit clerk who has completed the course of training and education and has satisfied his annual continuing education course requirements, and who is then elected for a succeeding term of office subsequent to the initial term for which he completed the training course, shall not be required to repeat the training and education course upon reelection. A circuit clerk that has served either a full term of office or part of a term of office before January 1, 1996, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, after taking office by election or otherwise, each circuit clerk shall be required to file annually in the office of the chancery clerk a certificate of completion of a course of continuing education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College. No circuit clerk shall have to comply with this subsection unless he will have been in office for five (5) months or more during a calendar year.

Each circuit clerk elected for a term commencing on or after January 1, 1992, shall be required to file annually the certificate required in subsection (2) of this section commencing January l, 1993.

The requirements for obtaining the certificates in this section shall be as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

Upon the failure of any circuit clerk to file with the chancery clerk the certificates of completion as provided in this section, such circuit clerk shall, in addition to any other fine or punishment provided by law for such conduct, not be entitled to any fee, compensation or salary, from any source, for services rendered as circuit clerk, for the period of time during which such certificate remains unfiled.

The Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center shall prepare and conduct courses of training for basic and continuing education for circuit clerks of this state. The basic course of training shall be known as the “Circuit Clerks Training Course” and shall consist of at least thirty-two (32) hours of training. The continuing education course shall be known as the “Continuing Education Course for Circuit Clerks” and shall consist of at least eighteen (18) hours of training. The content of the basic and continuing education courses and when and where such courses are to be conducted shall be determined by the judicial college. The judicial college shall issue certificates of completion to those circuit clerks who complete such courses.

The expenses of the training, including training of those elected as circuit clerk who have not yet begun their term of office, shall be borne as an expense of the office of the circuit clerk.

Circuit clerks shall be allowed credit toward their continuing education course requirements for attendance at circuit court proceedings if the presiding circuit court judge certifies that the circuit clerk was in actual attendance at a term or terms of court; provided, however, that at least twelve (12) hours per year of the continuing education course requirements must be completed at a regularly established program or programs conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College.

By August 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the Administrative Office of Courts shall certify to the Mississippi Judicial College the names of all circuit clerks who have failed to provide the information required by Section 9-1-46. The judicial college shall not issue a certificate of continuing education required by subsection (2) of this section to any such clerk, and shall report to the State Auditor, and the board of supervisors of the county the clerk is elected from that the clerk shall not be entitled to receive the compensation set out in subsection (5) of this section. A clerk may be certified after coming into compliance with the requirements of Section 9-1-46.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 595, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 9-7-123.
Appointment of deputy clerks; oath; bond.

The clerk of the circuit court shall have power, with the approbation of the court, or of the judge in vacation, to appoint one or more deputies, who shall take the oath of office and may give bond, and who thereupon shall have power to do and perform all the acts and duties which their principal may lawfully do; such approval, when given by the judge in vacation, shall be in writing, and shall be entered on the minutes of the court at the next term.

Each deputy clerk of the circuit court, before he enters upon the duties of the appointment, shall take the oath of office, and shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to three percent (3%) of the sum of all the state and county taxes shown by the assessment rolls and the levies to have been collectible in the county for the year immediately preceding the commencement of the term of office for the circuit clerk. However, the amount of such bond shall not be less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) nor more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). The bond shall cover all monies coming into the hands of the deputy clerk by law or order of the court. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the bond on behalf of the deputy clerk.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 27, class 2, art. 1 (12), class 3, art. 1 (10); 1857, ch. 61, art. 17, ch. 62, art. 13; 1871, §§ 551, 990; 1880, § 2281; 1892, § 930; 1906, § 1006; Hemingway’s 1917, § 726; 1930, § 747; 1942, § 1662; Laws, 1999, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 9-7-124.
Appointment of temporary deputies to assist circuit clerk of county.

The board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may authorize the circuit clerk of the county to appoint one or more temporary full-time or temporary part-time deputies for the purpose of assisting the circuit clerk in the performance of duties relating to certification of signatures on initiative petitions as provided by Section 23-17-21.

The salary of any temporary deputy clerk appointed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be established by the board of supervisors and paid out of any available funds in the county general fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 323, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 9-7-125.
Deputy circuit clerks; appointment and payment in certain counties.

The circuit clerk of every county wherein is partially located a national forest and wherein U. S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 26 intersect may appoint a full-time or part-time deputy to insure the efficient operation of the office of circuit clerk of said county.

The boards of supervisors in said counties are authorized to pay to said circuit clerk a sum not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00) per month for employment of such deputy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1662.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 278, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 387, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 9-7-126.
Additional remuneration to circuit court clerks for salaries of deputy circuit clerks.

There shall be allowed out of the county treasury from the general county funds, or any other available funds payable monthly by the board of supervisors of the county, not less than the following amounts for the purposes of defraying the salaries of deputy circuit clerks:

Class 1 and 2 counties not less than Four Hundred Fifty Dollars ($450.00) per month;

Class 3 and 4 counties not less than Three Hundred Fifty Dollars ($350.00) per month;

Class 5, 6, 7 and 8 counties not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per month.

The above and foregoing allowances shall be for the purposes of defraying the salaries of deputy circuit clerks provided such allowance, and upon written request of the circuit clerk, shall be paid directly to the deputy circuit clerk designated by him, in the absence of which request, the allowance shall be paid monthly to the circuit clerk. Deputy circuit clerks employed under authority of this section shall be deemed employees of the county. The clerk shall select and supervise their public duties.

This section shall not apply to any county having a county court except that in any county in which U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 6 intersect, any county in which U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 4 intersect, any county having a population in excess of fifty-seven thousand (57,000) and which is traversed by the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway or whose county seat is within twenty (20) miles of the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway, any county bordering the State of Tennessee and the Mississippi River, any county in which U.S. Highway 61 and U.S. Highway 82 intersect, any county in which U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 8 intersect, any county in which U.S. Highway 82 and U.S. Highway 49E intersect, any county in which U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect and which is traversed by Interstate Highway 55, and any county in which Highway 589 and Highway 98 intersect, the provisions of this section shall be discretionary with the respective board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3934.9; Laws, 1972, ch. 467, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 424; Laws, 1986, ch. 402; Laws, 1994, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 422, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 9-7-127.
Final record to be made.

Within three (3) months after the final determination of any suit, or if an appeal shall have been taken, then within three (3) months after receiving a certificate of the affirmance of the judgment, the clerk shall enter in a well-bound book, to be kept for the purpose, a full and complete record of all the proceedings in the suit, if the title to the real estate be involved or affected, and if not, only on the order of the court. On failure to make a final record required by law or the order of the court, the clerk may be fined, as for a contempt, Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each failure; and he shall also be liable in damages to any party injured. A final record shall not be made of any suit without a judgment on the merits. Such record may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-7-171.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 640; 1906, § 697; Hemingway’s 1917, § 476; 1930, § 485; 1942, § 1423; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 18; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-7-128.
Disposal and destruction of certain case files and loose records; electronic storage of certain files, records and documents.

Where there is no requirement for a permanent record to be made, the clerk, upon order of the court, may dispose of and destroy all case files of the circuit or county court which have been in existence for ten (10) years or which have been reduced to judgment and that judgment satisfied and cancelled. The clerk may also dispose of and destroy any loose records not required by law to be kept as permanent records after a period of ten (10) years. No records, however, may be destroyed without the approval of the Director of the Department of Archives and History.

The files, records and other documents described herein may, upon order of the court in accordance with the provisions of this section, be electronically stored for convenience and efficiency in storage. The electronic storage of documents, for purposes of this section, shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 9-1-51. In those counties electing to store files, records and documents by means of electronic storage, the following described case files shall be electronically stored after the time periods described below have elapsed:

Cases in county criminal or civil court which have been dismissed or in which a judgment has been entered at least three (3) years prior to the date upon which they are electronically stored; and

Cases in circuit, criminal or civil court which have been dismissed or in which a judgment has been entered at least five (5) years prior to the date upon which they are electronically stored.

Nothing in this section shall serve as authority to destroy any docket book, minute book, issue docket, subpoena docket, witness docket book, execution docket book, voter registration book, marriage record book, trial order, abstract of judgment, judgment roll, criminal file where an indictment was returned and the defendant convicted if the file is not at least twenty (20) years old, habeas corpus docket, preliminary hearing docket or Court of Appeals or Supreme Court appeals docket.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 1423; Laws, 1972, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 1981 ch. 501, § 19; Laws, 1987, ch. 470; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 23, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-129.
List of allowances against county treasury.

Within ten days after each term of circuit court, it shall be the duty of the clerk to deliver to the clerk of the board of supervisors a certified list of allowances made by the court at such term, payable out of the county treasury, specifying the amount, to whom allowed, and on what account. For any failure to deliver such list, the clerk of the circuit court may be punished by the court as for a contempt.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1491; 1892, § 641; 1906, § 698; Hemingway’s 1917, § 477; 1930, § 486; 1942, § 1424.

§ 9-7-131.
Jury fee book.

The clerk of the circuit court shall keep a book to be called the “jury book,” in which he shall enter the time of issuing all certificates to jurors, the amount thereof, and to whom issued. Such book may be kept by means of electronic filing or storage or both as provided in Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, or otherwise, as the clerk may elect. Within ten (10) days after each term of the court, he shall file in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors of his county a certified copy of such entries, for the information of the board. For any failure in this respect, the clerk of the circuit court may be fined and imprisoned by the court as for a contempt.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 145; 1871, § 746; 1880, § 1699; 1892, § 642; 1906, § 699; Hemingway’s 1917, § 478; 1930, § 487; 1942, § 1425; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 9-7-133.
Jury tax imposed and how collected.

A jury tax of three dollars is imposed on each original suit in the circuit court in which a plea is filed, and on every issue therein tried separately by a jury, and a tax of two dollars on each case transferred or appealed thereto, to constitute a fund for the payment of jurors, and to be collected by the clerk or sheriff as costs. The clerk shall be liable on his official bond for any failure to charge, receive, or issue execution for the jury tax; and the sheriff shall likewise be liable for a failure to collect or to pay the same to the county treasurer; and they may be fined as for a contempt therefor not more than one hundred dollars.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 4 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 147; 1871, § 525; 1880, § 1700; 1892, § 643; 1906, § 700; Hemingway’s 1917, § 479; 1930, § 488; 1942, § 1426.

§ 9-7-135.
Clerk to report list of cases subject to jury tax.

Within ten days after the end of any term of the court, the clerk shall furnish to the clerk of the board of supervisors a list of all judgments rendered and suits disposed of at such term, or in the preceding vacation, on which a jury tax is imposed, and shall pay over all sums received by him for jury tax during the term and since the last term, and for any failure shall be liable as provided by Section 9-7-133. And if any clerk shall fail to furnish the said list he shall be fined by the court in the sum of one hundred dollars, on motion of the clerk of the board of supervisors or the district attorney.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 4 (3); 1857, ch. 61, art. 148; 1871, § 749; 1880, § 1701; 1892, § 644; 1906, § 701; Hemingway’s 1917, § 480; 1930, § 489; 1942, § 1427.

§ 9-7-137.
Register of sureties on bonds to be kept.

The clerk of the circuit court shall procure a well-bound book, arranged alphabetically and properly ruled, lined and headed to show the name of the principal and surety, name of principal obligor, name of obligee, date of bond, penalty of bond, kind of bond, where recorded if recorded, number of suit in which filed and date of discharge. In this he shall abstract each bond, when filed in his office, by entering in such record the name of each principal and surety, under the proper letter, the name of principal obligor, name of obligee, date, penalty, kind of bond, where recorded if recorded, and number of suit in which filed. And when such bond has been discharged, the date thereof shall be entered in said record under the proper heading. Such information may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-7-171.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1375; 1892, § 2695; 1906, §§ 527, 3055; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 284, 2413; 1930, §§ 345, 2247; 1942, §§ 345, 1256; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 20; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-7-139.
Recordation of pardons in county of conviction.

When a pardon may be granted by the governor to anyone convicted of a crime, two copies thereof shall be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of Section 7-3-5, Mississippi Code of 1972. One such copy shall be retained by the secretary of state in a permanent register and the other copy shall be immediately forwarded by the secretary of state to the circuit clerk of the county in which such person was convicted. The county shall furnish and the circuit clerk shall maintain a permanent record of pardons and the circuit clerk may certify the fact of any recorded pardon for use in any court or agency, state or federal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1427.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 368, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 9-7-141.
Circuit court clerk’s office at Biloxi.

In Harrison County, a county having two (2) judicial districts, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the circuit court to keep in his office at Biloxi, all records, record books, electronic equipment, records and documents and other documents of every character which he is now required by law to keep in his office at Gulfport, and said records, record books and documents of whatever character or duly certified copies thereof shall have the same force and effect in law as they would have if said books, records and documents had been kept or preserved by him in his office at Gulfport. And likewise, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the circuit court of Harrison County, as clerk of county court to keep in his office at Biloxi, all of the records, record books and documents of every character which he is now required by law to keep in his office at Gulfport, and said records, books and documents, or duly certified copies thereof, shall likewise have the same force and effect in law as they would have if said books, records and documents had been kept or preserved by him in his office at Gulfport.

The Secretary of State shall furnish to the Clerk of the Circuit Court of Harrison County, for the use of said court at Biloxi, a full set of the reports of the Supreme Court or court of last resort of this state, and all other books and laws which he shall at any time be required to deliver to the sheriff or the clerk of said county, in the several counties of this state; and also all other laws, maps and public documents required by law to be furnished, or usually furnished, to the sheriff or clerk of the circuit and chancery courts of this state under laws now or heretofore in force or that may hereafter be enacted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2910-07, 2910-20; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, §§ 7, 20; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).